Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Jurors and Verdict.

Cross references. —

For court rules on jurors, see Civ. R. 47.

Collateral references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d, Jury, § 1 et seq.

50A C.J.S., Juries, § 1 et seq.

Communication or contact between witnesses and jurors in civil case, 52 ALR2d 182.

Jury in civil case taking depositions to jury room during deliberations as ground for new trial, 57 ALR2d 1011.

Communication or contact between juror and party or counsel during trial of civil case, 62 ALR2d 298.

Providing food or drink for, treating, or entertaining of juror by party or counsel during trial of civil case as ground for new trial, 62 ALR2d 323.

Communication or contact between juror and outsider during trial of civil case, 64 ALR2d 158.

Treating of juror by outsider during trial of civil case as ground for new trial, 64 ALR2d 219.

Withdrawal of waiver of jury trial, 64 ALR2d 506; 9 ALR4th 1041; 48 ALR4th 747.

Inattention of juror from sleepiness or other cause as ground for reversal or new trial, 88 A.L.R.2d 1275.

Indoctrination by court of persons summoned for jury service as violation of right to jury trial, 89 ALR2d 215.

Rule of statute requiring opposing party’s consent to withdrawal of demand for jury trial, 90 ALR2d 1162.

Sufficiency of waiver of full jury, 93 ALR2d 410.

Use of intoxicating liquor by jurors:
civil cases, 6 ALR3d 934.

Taking and use of trial notes by jury, 14 ALR3d 831.

Prejudicial effect of holding accused in contempt of court in presence of jury, 29 ALR3d 1399.

Propriety of jurors asking questions in open court during course of trial, 31 A.L.R.3d 872.

Admissibility, in civil case, of juror’s affidavit or testimony relating to juror’s misconduct outside jury room, 32 ALR3d 1356.

Juror’s voir dire denial or nondisclosure of acquaintance or relationship with attorney in case, or with partner or associate of such attorney, as ground for new trial or mistrial, 64 ALR3d 126.

Trial jurors as witnesses in same state court or related case, 86 ALR3d 781.

Counsel’s appeal in civil case to self-interest or prejudice of jurors as taxpayers, as ground for mistrial, new trial or reversal, 93 ALR3d 556.

Authority of state court to order jury trial in civil case where jury has been waived or not demanded by parties, 9 ALR4th 1041.

Propriety of attorney’s communication with jurors after trial, 19 ALR4th 1209.

Propriety of juror’s tests or experiments in jury room, 31 ALR4th 566.

Validity of jury selection as affected by accused’s absence from conducting of procedures for selection and impaneling of final jury panel for specific case, 33 ALR4th 429.

Exclusion of public and media from voir dire examination of prospective jurors in state criminal case, 16 ALR5th 152.

Contractual jury trial waivers in state civil cases, 42 A.L.R.5th 53.

Complexity of civil action as affecting Seventh Amendment right to trial by jury, 54 ALR Fed. 733.

Sec. 09.20.010.
Qualification of jurors; interpreters.

A person is qualified to act as a juror if the person is

a citizen of the United States;

a resident of the state;

at least 18 years of age;

of sound mind;

in possession of the person’s natural faculties; and

able to read or speak the English language.

A person is not disqualified from serving as a juror solely because of the loss of hearing or sight in any degree or a disability that substantially impairs or interferes with the person’s mobility.

The court shall provide, and pay the cost of services of, an interpreter or reader when necessary to enable a person with impaired hearing or sight to act as a juror.

History.

(§ 2.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For court rules on interpreter’s fees, see Admin. R. 6.

Sec. 09.20.020.
Disqualification of jurors.

A person is disqualified from serving as a juror if the person

has served as a juror in the state within one year of the time of examination for service; or

has been convicted of a felony for which the person has not been unconditionally discharged; unconditional discharge has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 2.02 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For challenges of jurors for cause, see Civ. R. 47(c).

Sec. 09.20.025.
Limitation on jury service.

A person may not be required to serve more than a total of three months as a juror during any consecutive two-year period. However, if a person is serving as a juror at the conclusion of the three months period, that person shall complete the trial then in progress.
In this section, a person is “serving as a juror” whenever that person is in attendance in court as a member of a jury or a jury panel.

History.

(§ 1 ch 147 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 66 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.20.030.
Exemptions.

A person may claim exemption and may be excused from service as a juror if it is shown that the person’s health, the health or proper care of the person’s family, a permanent physical or mental disability, or other substantial hardship expected to last more than two years makes it necessary for the person to be excused, or if the person is a judicial officer.

A person may claim exemption and shall be excused by the court from service as a juror during the school term if it is shown that the person is a teacher in a school that is designated as a low performing school under regulations adopted by the state Board of Education and Early Development. In this subsection, “teacher” means a person who serves a school district in a teaching capacity in a classroom setting and is required to be certificated in order to hold the position.

History.

(§ 2.03 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1964; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

The addition of subsection (b) to AS

09.20.030

by sec. 1, ch. 104, SLA 2004, has the effect of amending Rule 15(k) (now Rule 15(l)), Alaska Rules of Administration, by establishing an additional cause for exemption from jury service.
See § 2, ch. 104, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b), substituted “a low performing school under regulations adopted by the state Board of Education and Early Development” for “failing to make adequate yearly progress under P.L. 107-110”.

Collateral references. —

Relationship of juror to witness in civil case as ground of disqualification, 85 ALR2d 851.

Proper procedure upon illness or other disability of civil case juror, 99 ALR2d 684.

Religious belief as ground for exemption or excuse from jury service, 2 ALR3d 1392.

Claustrophobia or other neurosis of juror as subject of inquiry on voir dire or of disqualification of juror, 20 ALR3d 1420.

Law enforcement officers as qualified jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 895.

Former law enforcement officers as qualified jurors in criminal cases, 72 ALR3d 958.

Deafness of juror as ground impeaching verdict, or securing new trial or reversal on appeal, 38 ALR4th 1170.

Sec. 09.20.035.
Deferral of jury service.

A person may have jury service deferred if the person shows that jury service at the time for which the person is summoned will cause hardship to that person or another, that transportation problems make it temporarily impossible for the person to serve, or that the person summoned is employed as a full-time or temporary election official and the jury service is during the month in which a primary or general election is held. Jury service may be deferred under this section only if the person seeking the deferment agrees to a deferred date. Jury service may not be deferred for more than 10 months from the date the initial jury service was to begin.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Sec. 09.20.037.
Protection for employee on jury duty.

An employer may not deprive an employee of employment or threaten, coerce, or penalize an employee because the employee receives or responds to a summons for jury service, serves as a juror, or attends court for prospective jury service. This section does not require an employer to pay wages to an employee for time spent on jury service or in court for prospective jury service.

If an employer violates this section, the employee may bring a civil action to recover wages lost as a result of the violation, other damages that resulted from the violation, and may also seek an order requiring the reinstatement of the employee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 34 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.20.015.
Renumbered in 1988.

Collateral references. —

Jurors as within coverage of workers’ compensation acts, 13 ALR5th 444.

Sec. 09.20.040.
Compliance with statute.

The selection of jurors shall be made in substantial compliance with AS

09.20.040

—

09.20.090

. A failure in substantial compliance that prejudices the rights of a party is reversible error.

History.

(§ 2.04 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Sec. 09.20.050.
Jury list.

At such times as need may require, but not later than November 30 of each year, the administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall prepare for each judicial district a list of the names of the residents of the district who are qualified by law for jury service. If the superior court is located in different cities in the same judicial district, the administrative director shall prepare for each location of the court a list of the names of the qualified residents of that portion of the district considered to be appropriate.

The jury list shall be based on a list prepared by the Department of Revenue of all persons who filed an application for a distribution of Alaska permanent fund income under AS 43.23 during the current calendar year that shows an Alaska address, and of all persons who volunteer for jury duty under (d) of this section. If considered necessary by the administrative director of the Alaska Court System, the jury list shall incorporate a list prepared by the Department of Administration of all persons who hold a valid Alaska driver’s license. The departments shall submit their respective lists to the Alaska Court System not later than September 30 of each year. To the extent that it is available, the departments shall include on the lists they submit the following information for each person: first name, middle initial, and last name; mailing address, including the zip code; and birth date. The lists shall be recorded on magnetic tape compatible with Alaska Court System data processing equipment.

A copy of the appropriate portion of the jury list shall be transmitted to the presiding judge of each judicial district and shall only be used to summon jurors and for other purposes of judicial administration. Duplicate names and the names of deceased persons and persons permanently excused from jury service shall be eliminated from the list before it is transmitted to the presiding judge. A questionnaire for prospective jurors may be adopted and submitted to them by the administrative director of the Alaska Court System.

A person who is qualified as a juror under AS

09.20.010

and is not disqualified from serving as a juror by AS

09.20.020

may volunteer for jury duty by contacting the administrative director of the Alaska Court System and providing the information the administrative director may require.

History.

(§ 2.05 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1971; am §§ 3, 4 ch 66 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 92 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 7 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 99 § 13 (1997); am §§ 6, 7 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

For court administrative rules relating to jury list, see Admin.
R. 15(b).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” in the first sentence in (a) and in the last sentence in (c).

Sec. 09.20.060.
Use of jury box or computer list.

The clerk of the court shall write the names included in the list on separate pieces of paper or prepare metal, plastic, or other types of pieces to correspond to numbers on the jury list.
As directed by the court, the clerk shall deposit the named or numbered pieces in the jury box in a number and manner to assure a fair and impartial drawing of the jury panel.
A randomly generated computer list of prospective jurors may be used in place of the jury box.
The jury box and the named or numbered pieces, or the computer list may be examined by the parties or by an attorney authorized to practice law in the state within limitations and under conditions prescribed by the court.

History.

(§ 2.06 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 66 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.20.070.
Public drawing for jurors for panel.

Under the direction of the court the clerk shall conduct the public drawing of jurors for the panel by shaking the box to mix the named or numbered pieces. The clerk shall then draw as many names or numbers as are ordered by the court to fill the jury panel.
A random selection of the jury panel by computer may be used in place of the public drawing of names.
If the name or number of a person is drawn or selected and the person is deceased, unqualified, disqualified, or the person’s attendance cannot be obtained within a reasonable time or may involve a large and unnecessary expense, and the fact appears to the satisfaction of the court through the use of questionnaires or otherwise, the court may reject the name of that person and direct that the name or number of another be drawn.

History.

(§ 2.07 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 6 ch 66 SLA 1981)

Sec. 09.20.080.
Jury panel.

The jury panel for the trial of civil cases consists of at least twice the number of jurors needed to serve on a trial jury, including any needed alternate jurors. If the number of jurors on the panel falls below the number required by this section or if the regular panel is exhausted, the court shall order the clerk to complete the panel or to secure additional jurors by drawing names from the jury box or by obtaining names from the randomly generated computer list.

If the list of prospective jurors for a court location does not produce sufficient names for a jury panel of minimum size, the administrative director of the Alaska Court System may authorize that additional names of prospective jurors be randomly selected from sources other than those listed in AS

09.20.050

.

History.

(§ 2.08 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 66 SLA 1981; am § 8 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Cross references. —

For related provisions in the court administrative rules, see Admin.
R. 15(c) and (g).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 10, 2011, substituted “the Alaska Court System” for “courts” in (b).

Sec. 09.20.090.
Impaneling the trial jury.

When a civil case that is to be tried by a jury is called for trial, the clerk shall draw from the trial jury box containing the names of those on the jury panel a number of names or numbers sufficient to name a jury of 12 unless the court directs otherwise. The prospective jurors shall be examined, challenged, and sworn as provided by rules of the supreme court.

History.

(§ 2.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see Admin.
R. 15(h) and (i) and Civ. R. 47.

Sec. 09.20.100.
Verdicts.

In a civil case tried by a jury in any court, whether of record or not, not less than five-sixths of the jury may render a verdict, which is entitled to the legal effect of a unanimous verdict at common law. Special verdicts need not be concurred in by the same jurors.

History.

(§ 2.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For related provisions, see Civ.
R. 47(f) and 49(a).